Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 41. Department of Public Safety.

Sec. 44.41.010.
Commissioner of public safety.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Public Safety is the commissioner of public safety.

History.

(§ 18 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, § 1 et seq

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 8

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, § 1 et seq.

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, § 64.

81A C.J.S., States, § 252.

Sec. 44.41.020.
Powers and duties of department.

The Department of Public Safety shall administer functions relative to the protection of life and property, including functions relating to transfer of a firearm. The department may enter into agreements with nonprofit organizations and federal and local government agencies to train personnel of those agencies in the protection of life and property. The department may charge a reasonable fee for services provided under a training agreement or for services relating to transfer of a firearm.

The department may enter into agreements with federal and local government agencies to provide a statewide criminal justice information system. Reasonable fees may be charged by the department to cover the costs of providing services under these agreements, including maintenance of terminal hardware and network connect charges.

The department shall establish, and may require state and local law enforcement agencies to use, standardized methods of collecting and recording law enforcement and crime statistics.

The Department of Public Safety may operate state housing in support of the department’s statutory responsibilities and charge rent consistent with applicable collective bargaining agreements, or, if no collective bargaining agreement is applicable, competitive with market conditions.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 55 SLA 2012]

The Department of Public Safety shall establish by regulation standardized forms for citations issued by law enforcement officers and other persons authorized by law to issue citations in the state.

The Department of Public Safety shall manage and administer the peace officer and firefighter survivors fund established in AS

39.60.010

in cooperation with the Department of Administration. The Department of Public Safety shall establish standardized procedures and forms for use in administering the peace officer and firefighter survivors fund.

The Department of Public Safety shall provide administrative services to the Violent Crimes Compensation Board.

History.

(§ 18 ch 64 SLA 1959; am §§ 74, 75 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1989; am § 60 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 19, 20 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 1 SSSLA 1999; am E.O. No. 110, § 7 (2003); am § 49 ch 29 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 55 SLA 2012; am § 6 ch 14 SLA 2017; am E.O. No 120, §
2 (2021))

Administrative Code. —

For scope and purpose of the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, added (f).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, repealed (e).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added (g).

The 2021 amendment, effective March 12, 2021, added (h).

Sec. 44.41.021.
Grant authority.

The Department of Public Safety may award grants necessary or incidental to the performance of the duties and execution of the powers of the division of fire prevention.

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 101 § 4 (2000))

Sec. 44.41.025.
Fingerprints.

The Department of Public Safety may maintain an automated fingerprint system.

The commissioner of public safety may establish by regulation and the Department of Public Safety may charge a reasonable fee to be paid by a person requesting information from the Alaska automated fingerprint system and by a person submitting fingerprints under (d) of this section.

The department may enter into the Alaska automated fingerprint identification system the fingerprints of a minor whose fingerprints are taken under AS

47.12.210

.

Each of the following may submit a complete set of fingerprints of the person designated for inclusion in the Alaska automated fingerprint system:

a person may submit the person’s own fingerprints;

the parent or guardian of a minor who is two years of age or older may submit the minor’s fingerprints; and

the guardian or conservator of a person under AS 13.26 may submit the fingerprints of the person protected by the guardian or conservator.

The commissioner may maintain the fingerprint sets of minors who are under 14 years of age submitted under (d)(2) of this section in a file separate from the general file for all other fingerprints maintained under (a) of this section.

Upon request by a person who is 18 years of age or older, the commissioner shall remove from the records of the Alaska automated fingerprint system the complete set of the person’s fingerprints submitted by the parent or guardian of the person under (d)(2) of this section. The regulations must establish a procedure for the submission of a request under this subsection and for notification that the fingerprint set has been removed from the records in response to the request.

History.

(§ 76 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 121 SLA 1988; am § 21 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 12 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For scope and purpose of the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 1.

For reporting information to the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 2.

For central repository of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 6.

Sec. 44.41.030.
Report to division of personnel. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 44.41.035.
DNA identification system.

To support criminal justice services in this state, the Department of Public Safety shall establish a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) identification registration system.

The Department of Public Safety shall collect for inclusion into the DNA identification registration system a blood sample, oral sample, or both, from (1) a person convicted in this state of a crime against a person or a felony under AS 11, AS 26.05, or AS 28.35, or a law or ordinance with elements similar to a crime against a person or a felony under AS 11, AS 26.05, or AS 28.35, (2) a minor adjudicated as a delinquent in this state for an act committed when the minor was 16 years of age or older that would be a crime against a person or a felony under AS 11, AS 26.05, or AS 28.35 if committed by an adult, or for an act that would violate a law or ordinance with elements similar to a crime against a person or a felony under AS 11, AS 26.05, or AS 28.35 if committed by an adult, (3) a voluntary donor, (4) an anonymous DNA donor for use in forensic validation, forensic protocol development, quality control, or population or statistical data bases, (5) a person required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63, and (6) a person arrested for a crime against a person or a felony under AS 11, AS 26.05, or AS 28.35, or a law or ordinance with elements similar to a crime against a person or a felony under AS 11, AS 26.05, or AS 28.35. The department also may collect for inclusion into the DNA identification registration system a blood sample, oral sample, or tissue sample from crime scene evidence or from unidentified human remains. The DNA identification registration system consists of the blood, oral, or tissue samples drawn under this section, any DNA or other blood grouping tests done on those samples, and the identification data related to the samples or tests. Blood samples, oral samples, and tissue samples not subject to testing under this section, and test or identification data related to those samples, may not be entered into, or made a part of, the DNA identification registration system.

The Department of Public Safety may

analyze DNA for law enforcement agencies; and

assist law enforcement officials and prosecutors in the preparation and use of DNA evidence for presentation in court.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, a local law enforcement agency may not establish or operate a DNA identification registration system unless

the equipment and the DNA typing method of the local system are compatible with that of the state system under (a) of this section;

the local system is equipped to receive and answer inquiries from the department’s DNA identification registration system and transmit data to the department’s DNA identification registration system; and

procedure and rules for the collection, analysis, storage, expungement, and use of DNA identification data do not conflict with this section and procedures and rules applicable to the department’s DNA identification registration system.

Nothing in (d) of this section prohibits a local law enforcement agency from performing DNA identification analysis in individual cases to assist law enforcement officials and prosecutors in the preparation and use of DNA evidence for presentation in court.

The DNA identification registration system is confidential, is not a public record under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

, and may be used only for

providing DNA or other blood grouping tests for identification analysis;

criminal investigations, prosecutions, and identification of human remains;

statistical blind analysis;

improving the operation of the system; or

exoneration of the innocent.

A person or minor from whom a sample has been collected under this section

may inspect and obtain a copy of the identification data regarding the person or minor contained within the DNA identification registration system; and

may request the Department of Public Safety to destroy the material in the system regarding the person or minor under the provisions described in (i) of this section.

The Department of Public Safety shall adopt reasonable procedures

for the collection, analysis, storage, expungement, and use of the DNA identification registration system; and

to protect the DNA identification registration system established under this section from unauthorized access and from accidental or deliberate damage by theft, sabotage, fire, flood, wind, or power failure.

The Department of Public Safety shall destroy the material in the system relating to a person or minor on the written request of the person or minor, if the request is accompanied by a certified copy of a court order making the written findings required by this subsection. The court shall issue an order under this subsection if the person’s or minor’s DNA was included in the system under

(b)(1) or (2) of this section, and the court order establishes that

the conviction or adjudication that subjected the person to having a sample taken under this section was reversed; and

the person

was not retried, readjudicated, or convicted or adjudicated for another crime that requires having a sample taken under this section; or

after retrial, was acquitted of the crime or, after readjudication for the crime, was not found to be a delinquent, and was not convicted or adjudicated for another crime that requires a sample under this section;

(b)(6) of this section, and the court order establishes that

the person arrested was released without being charged;

the criminal complaint, indictment, presentment, or information for the offense for which the person was arrested was dismissed, and a criminal complaint, indictment, presentment, or information for an offense requiring submission of a DNA sample was not refiled; or

the person was found by the trier of fact to be not guilty of the offense for which the person was arrested and was not convicted of another offense requiring submission of a DNA sample under (b)(1) or (2) of this section.

The Department of Public Safety may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

The provisions of this section apply to a person or a minor from another state that this state has accepted under any interstate corrections or probation agreement or compact, regardless of whether the person or minor is confined or released, if the person was convicted of or the minor was adjudicated for an offense that is similar to an offense described in (b) of this section.

The Department of Public Safety may not include in the DNA identification registration system a blood sample, oral sample, or tissue sample of the victim of a crime, unless that person would otherwise be included under (b)(1) — (6) of this section.

The commissioner of public safety shall notify the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives if, at any time after July 1, 2003, the federal government fails to pay the costs of the DNA identification registration system.

A juvenile or adult correctional, probation, or parole officer or a peace officer may use reasonable force to collect an oral sample for inclusion into the DNA identification registration system from a person required to submit to collection of a sample under this section, AS

12.55.015(h)

,

12.55.100(d)

, AS

33.16.150(a)

, or another law.

A person or minor may not bring a civil action against the state or a municipality, or their employees or agents, for actions arising out of DNA collection in conformity with this section.

The department shall make every reasonable effort to process each sample collected from a person under (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(5), and (b)(6) of this section and include the identification data resulting from the testing of the sample in the DNA identification registration system within 90 days after receiving the sample.

A DNA sample collected or placed in the DNA identification registration system that was taken or retained in good faith may be used as provided by law in a criminal investigation. Evidence obtained from a match from a data collection system may be used in a criminal prosecution or juvenile adjudication if the DNA sample was taken or retained in good faith, even if the DNA sample is later removed from the DNA identification registration system.

If a sample collected under (b) of this section does not contain sufficient material necessary to obtain an accurate DNA identification authorized under this section, the Department of Public Safety or other agency authorized by the Department of Public Safety may collect another sample.

In this section,

“convicted” means that an adult, or a juvenile charged as an adult under AS 47.12 or a similar procedure in another jurisdiction, has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere, or has been found guilty, or guilty but mentally ill, by a court or jury, regardless of whether the judgment was set aside under AS

12.55.085

or a similar procedure in another jurisdiction or was the subject of a pardon or other executive clemency; a person is not “convicted” if the judgment against the person was reversed or vacated by a court;

“crime against a person” means an offense, or an attempt or solicitation to commit an offense, under AS 11.41;

“oral sample” means a sample taken from the mouth of a person that consists of saliva or tissue, or both, as is determined by the Department of Public Safety to be necessary to obtain an accurate DNA identification and to otherwise achieve the purposes of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 44 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2001; am §§ 5 — 11, 14 ch 88 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 12 SLA 2005; am §§ 32 — 35 ch 24 SLA 2007; am §§ 52 — 55 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 8 — 13 ch 20 SLA 2010; am § 40 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Subsections (j) — (

l

), enacted as (k) — (m), were relettered in 2003, at which time § 14, ch. 88, SLA 2003, was codified as subsection (m), and former subsection (j) was relettered as subsection (n) (now (q)). Within subsection (n) (now (q)), paragraph (1) was added as paragraph (3) and renumbered in 2003 to alphabetize the terms. Subsections (n) and (o) were enacted as (o) and (p).
Relettered in 2005, at which time former (n) was relettered as (p).

Subsection (p), enacted as (q), was relettered in 2007, at which time former subsection (p) was relettered as subsection (q).

Subsections (q) and (r) were enacted as (r) and (s); relettered in 2010, at which time subsection (q) was relettered as (s).

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative purpose relating to the provisions of ch. 88, SLA 2003, that amend this section, see § 1, ch. 88, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, added “identification” following “DNA” in (b), (

l

), and (n); and effective July 1, 2009, added “DNA” preceding “identification registration program” in (p).

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(2), deleted “16 years of age or older,” following “a minor”, and added “committed when the minor was 16 years of age or older” following “in this state for an act”; in (g), in the introductory language and in (g)(1), added “or minor” following “person”, added the (g)(1) and (g)(2) designations, added (g)(2); in (i), in the introductory language, deleted “, upon receipt of a court order,” following “Department of Public Safety shall”, in the first sentence, added “or minor on the written request of the person or minor, if the request is accompanied by a certified copy of a court order making the written findings required by this subsection.”, added (i)(2)(C), and made stylistic changes; in (k), twice added “or a minor” following “the person”, and added “or the minor was adjudicated for” following “person was convicted of”; in (o), added “or minor” following “A person”; added (r) (now (q)) and (s) (now (r)).

The 2018 amendment, effective August 14, 2018, in (b), inserted “, AS 26.05,” following “AS 11” throughout the subsection. Although the 2018 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until August 13, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendments were August 14, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 10, SLA 1995 provides that this section “applies to all convictions [for a crime against a person] occurring on or after January 1, 1996.”

Section 2, ch. 49, SLA 2001, provides that the 2001 amendment of (b) of this section “applies to all convictions and adjudications as a delinquent occurring on or after September 23, 2001.”

Under § 12, ch. 88, SLA 2003, the changes made by ch. 88, SLA 2003, apply to all convictions or adjudications of delinquency included under (b) of this section, as amended by that Act, that occur on or after July 1, 2003, or that occurred before July 1, 2003, if the person is incarcerated or is under supervised probation or parole for the offense on or after July 1, 2003, and to all persons required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63 before, on, or after July 1, 2003.

Section 3, ch. 12, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of subsection (b) and the 2005 additions of subsections (n) and (o) “apply to all convictions or adjudications of delinquency included under (b) of this section, as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, that

“(1) occur on or after May 6, 2005;

“(2) occurred before May 6, 2005 if the person is incarcerated or is on probation or parole for the offense on or after May 6, 2005.”

Sec. 44.41.040.
Criminal history fee. [Repealed, § 4 ch 118 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 12.62.]

Sec. 44.41.045.
Reports and records concerning involuntary commitment and adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence.

Upon receiving information under AS

47.30.907

, the Department of Public Safety shall transmit the information to the United States Department of Justice for inclusion in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System established under P.L. 103-159, 107 Stat. 1536 (Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act).

In transmitting information to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System under (a) of this section, the Department of Public Safety may not disclose diagnostic or treatment information regarding the person.

The Department of Public Safety may not use or permit the use of the information obtained or retained under this section for a purpose not specified in this section, except that the department may use the information to determine whether a person is qualified to receive and hold a permit to carry a concealed handgun under AS

18.65.705

.

Information obtained or retained under this section is confidential and is not a public record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 73, SLA 2014, which enacted this article, is effective October 8, 2014.

Sec. 44.41.050.
Uniform homicide reporting.

A law enforcement agency shall report each homicide or suspected homicide committed within the jurisdiction of the agency to the Department of Public Safety within 25 days of the homicide’s discovery. The report shall be on a form approved by the commissioner of public safety and must contain information as determined by the commissioner to be necessary to aid law enforcement personnel in comparing homicides and suspected homicides and discovering those that exhibit similar characteristics. If the Department of Public Safety determines that a homicide or suspected homicide meets the Violent Criminals Apprehension Program criteria, the department shall notify the law enforcement agency that submitted the report, and the agency shall complete and forward to the department within 30 days a Federal Bureau of Investigation Violent Criminals Apprehension Program form.

The Department of Public Safety shall enter the information submitted under (a) of this section into a file and shall compare the information to information on other homicides or suspected homicides for the purpose of discovering similarities in criminal methods and suspect descriptions. If the Department of Public Safety finds homicides exhibiting similar criminal methods or suspect descriptions, the department shall notify the concerned law enforcement agencies of the discoveries.

If a law enforcement agency terminates active investigation of a homicide or suspected homicide due to the arrest of a suspect, death of the primary suspect, or other reason, the agency shall notify the Department of Public Safety of the termination and the reason for the termination within 30 days following the termination.

The Department of Public Safety shall participate in the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Violent Criminals Apprehension Program. The Department of Public Safety shall transmit each Violent Criminals Apprehension Program report received under (a) of this section concerning homicides or suspected homicides, discoveries under (b) of this section of homicides exhibiting similar criminal methods or suspect descriptions, and notices of and reasons for termination of investigations of homicides received under (c) of this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Violent Criminals Apprehension Program manager, at least on a quarterly basis.

History.

(§ 3 ch 54 SLA 1994)

Sec. 44.41.060.
Missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plans.

The Department of Public Safety, in cooperation with the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, shall, using statewide and local radio and television broadcasts, newspapers, and other communications media,

develop and implement missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plans for use by law enforcement agencies, groups, and persons to locate a vulnerable adult who is missing; and

coordinate the use of those plans.

The plans required by (a) of this section must at least include standards for

determining when and where to implement a plan; standards developed under this paragraph must at least address

when a vulnerable adult will be considered missing; and

the format, contents, and distribution of reports prepared by participating law enforcement agencies and others searching for a missing vulnerable adult; and

voluntary participation in the plan by radio and television broadcasters, newspaper publishers, and owners and operators of other communications media.

Notwithstanding another provision of law,

a law enforcement agency, an officer or employee of the law enforcement agency, a person, or a group is not civilly liable for

failing to participate in a missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plan;

failing to implement a missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plan; or

activating a missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plan if implementation is undertaken in good faith;

a radio or television broadcaster, a newspaper publisher, or an owner or operator of other communications media is not civilly liable for participating in a missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plan or for participating in the actual implementation of a plan if the broadcaster, publisher, or owner or operator has verified the authenticity of the plan’s implementation with the law enforcement agency.

In this section, “vulnerable adult” means a person 18 years of age or older who, because of physical or mental impairment, is unable to meet the person’s own needs or to seek help without assistance.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 71, SLA 2013, which enacted this section, is effective October 8, 2013.

Sec. 44.41.065.
Sexual assault examination kits.

When a law enforcement agency collects a sexual assault examination kit under AS

18.68.010

, the agency shall

within 30 days after the agency collects the sexual assault examination kit, send the sexual assault examination kit to an accredited laboratory in coordination with the Department of Public Safety or a laboratory operated by the Department of Public Safety;

ensure that the laboratory to which the sexual assault examination kit is sent under (1) of this subsection conducts a serological or DNA test on the sexual assault examination kit within one year after the laboratory receives the sexual assault examination kit; and

within two weeks after the laboratory that receives the sexual assault examination kit under (1) of this subsection completes serological or DNA testing, make a reasonable effort to notify the victim from whom the sexual assault examination kit was collected that the sexual assault examination kit has been tested.

A criminal action may not be dismissed nor the evidence deemed nonadmissible for failure to be tested within the times established in (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

If a case is resolved before a sexual assault examination kit is tested, a law enforcement agency is not required to meet the time limits established in (a) of this section.

In this section,

“law enforcement agency” and “agency” have the meaning given to “law enforcement agency” in AS

12.36.090

;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.470

.

History.

(§ 126 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 150,
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019 made this section effective January 1, 2020.

Sec. 44.41.070.
Report on untested sexual assault examination kits.

By September 1 of each year, each law enforcement agency and state department charged with the maintenance, storage, and preservation of sexual assault examination kits shall conduct an inventory of untested sexual assault examination kits and report, in writing, to the Department of Public Safety the number of untested sexual assault examination kits in the possession of the agency or department, the number of sexual assault examination kits that the law enforcement agency or state department has determined are ineligible for testing under (e) of this section, with the reason or reasons the untested sexual assault examination kits were determined to be ineligible for testing, and the date on which each untested sexual assault examination kit was collected.

By November 1 of each year, the Department of Public Safety shall prepare and transmit a report to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives that contains

the number of untested sexual assault examination kits stored by each law enforcement agency or department and the number of sexual assault examination kits that the law enforcement agency or state department has determined are ineligible for testing under (e) of this section, with the reason or reasons the untested sexual assault examination kits were determined to be ineligible for testing;

the date each untested sexual assault examination kit was collected; and

a plan for addressing the backlog and prevention of a backlog of untested sexual assault examination kits.

The Department of Public Safety shall deliver a copy of the report prepared under (b) of this section to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available.

In this section, “untested sexual assault examination kit” means a sexual assault examination kit with evidence that

has been collected but that has not been submitted to a laboratory operated or approved by the Department of Public Safety for either a serological or DNA test; or

has been collected and submitted to a laboratory operated or approved by the Department of Public Safety but that has not had a serological or DNA test conducted on the evidence.

A sexual assault examination kit is ineligible for testing if the law enforcement agency or state department finds that the sexual assault examination kit

is scientifically unviable;

does not meet eligibility requirements for inclusion in the Combined DNA Index System database; or

was collected from a person who reported a sexual assault anonymously.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 2018; am §§
127 — 129 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective January 1, 2020, in (a), inserted “, the number of sexual assault examination kits that the law enforcement agency or state department has determined are ineligible for testing under (e) of this section, with the reason or reasons the untested sexual assault examination kits were determined to be ineligible for testing,”; in (b)(1), added “and the number of sexual assault examination kits that the law enforcement agency or state department has determined are ineligible for testing under (e) of this section, with the reason or reasons the untested sexual assault examination kites were determined to be ineligible for testing” at the end; and added (e).

Effective dates. —

Section 7,
ch. 48, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.

Secs. 44.41.100 — 44.41.130.
Alaska state fire commission. [Repealed, § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993.]